Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 22
HAZARDOUS SUBSTANCE INCIDENTS

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1980. This article was repealed and reenacted in 1983, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1983, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Law reviews:

For article, "Municipal Regulation of the Transportation of Hazardous Material", see 18

C

olo. Law. 651 (1989); for article, "Using Local Police Powers to Protect the Environment", see 24

C

olo. Law. 1063 (1995).

Section

29-22-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Hazardous substance" means any substance, material, waste, or mixture designated as a hazardous material, waste, or substance according to 49 Code of Federal Regulations Part 172, as amended, or by section 18-13-112 (2)(b), C.R.S., or as designated pursuant to the federal "Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980" (Pub.L. 96-510) as in effect July 1, 1983.

"Hazardous substance incident" means any emergency circumstance involving the sudden discharge of a hazardous substance which threatens immediate and irreparable harm to the environment or the health and safety of any individual other than individuals exposed to the risks associated with hazardous substances in the normal course of their employment. "Hazardous substance incident" includes those incidents of spilling, dumping, or abandonment of a hazardous substance, whether or not such spilling, dumping, or abandonment is found to threaten immediate and irreparable harm, but such term does not include any discharge of a hazardous substance authorized pursuant to any federal, state, or local law or regulation. "Hazardous substance incident" includes those incidents which occur during transportation of a hazardous substance, in which a spill does not occur during the incident but is threatened prior to or during the cleanup period.

As used in this section, "abandonment" means the act of leaving a thing with the intent not to retain possession of or assert ownership or control over it. The intent need not coincide with the act of leaving.

"Person" means any individual, public or private corporation, partnership, association, firm, trust, or estate, the state or any department, institution, or agency thereof, any municipal corporation, county, city and county, or other political subdivision of the state, or any other legal entity whatsoever which is recognized by law as the subject of rights and duties.

"Private property" means any property under the control, management, or operation of any person other than a governmental agency.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1216, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1338, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 93:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1739, § 33, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 29-22-101 as it existed prior to 1983.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the act amending subsection (2)(a) in 1993, see section 41 of chapter 292, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

29-22-102. Hazardous substance incidents - response authorities - designation - definition.

It is the purpose of this section to provide for the designation of emergency response authorities for hazardous substance incidents. Every emergency response authority designated in or pursuant to this section is responsible for providing and maintaining the capability for emergency response to a hazardous substance incident occurring within its jurisdiction. An emergency response authority may provide and maintain the capability for such response directly or through mutual aid or other agreements, including an agreement with a private entity to support the emergency response authority, responding fire departments, or other government agencies. Subject to the provisions of local or regional response agreements for hazardous substance incidents, the first emergency response authority, or its public agency designee through mutual aid or otherwise, to arrive at the scene of the incident, regardless of whether the incident occurs within its jurisdiction, is responsible for the emergency response as incident commander until such time as the emergency response authority that has jurisdiction over the incident site has arrived, after which unified command shall be followed until the emergency response has concluded. As used in this section, "emergency response to a hazardous substance incident" means taking the initial emergency action necessary to minimize the effects or threat of adverse effects of a hazardous substance incident on human health or the environment.

If a hazardous substance incident occurs on private property and is otherwise reportable to any federal, state, or local agency, the owner of the property or person or entity operating on the property shall promptly report the incident to and coordinate a response with the appropriate emergency response authority designated in or pursuant to this section. If the owner or operator does not undertake or coordinate an emergency response or if, in the judgment of the designated emergency response authority, there exists an imminent danger to human health or the environment beyond such property, the designated emergency response authority may undertake the emergency response to such hazardous substance incident, as provided in this section. Nothing in this subsection (2) shall be construed to prohibit the owner of private property or a person or entity operating on such property from undertaking the emergency response to a hazardous substance incident occurring on the property.

The governing body of every town, city, and city and county shall designate by ordinance or resolution an emergency response authority or authorities for hazardous substance incidents occurring within the corporate limits of such town, city, and city and county. The governing body shall annually report the designation to the hazardous materials section of the Colorado state patrol. Unless otherwise designated by ordinance or resolution, the fire authority responsible for the area within the corporate limits of such town, city, or city and county is the designated emergency response authority.

The board of county commissioners of every county in the state shall designate by ordinance or resolution the emergency response authority or authorities for hazardous substance incidents occurring within the unincorporated area of the county. The board shall annually report the designation to the hazardous materials section of the Colorado state patrol. Unless otherwise designated by ordinance or resolution, the county sheriff responsible for the unincorporated area of the county is the designated emergency response authority.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 99, p. 432, 1, effective April 30, 1999.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 99, p. 432, § 1, effective April 30, 1999.)

For the purposes of this section, if a hazardous substance incident occurs on any federal, state, or county highway located outside of municipal city limits, the Colorado state patrol shall be the emergency response authority for such hazardous substance incident.

The Colorado state patrol may delegate such authority to the emergency response authority designated pursuant to subsection (3) of this section or to any public entity capable of performing the emergency response to a hazardous substance incident upon approval of the governing body of the entity receiving authority under such delegation.

In performing its duties under this subsection (5), the Colorado state patrol shall, when practicable, locate its emergency response resources based upon its assessment of the hazardous substances emergency response needs of the different geographic areas of the state.

The Colorado state patrol shall actively coordinate its emergency response capabilities and plans with local emergency response agencies.

Each governing body identified in subsection (3) of this section and the Colorado state patrol shall, as necessary, exercise continuing supervisory authority in consultation with other federal, state, and local agencies having regulatory jurisdiction for the cleanup and removal of the hazardous substance involved in an incident.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1217, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 432, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 2016:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, (HB 16-1046), ch. 60, p. 157, § 1, effective March 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 29-22-102 as it existed prior to 1983.

29-22-103. Emergency response authority may request assistance.

Any emergency response authority that, in its judgment, does not have the equipment, personnel, or expertise necessary to handle a particular hazardous substance incident may make a request to any public agency or private entity possessing such necessary equipment, personnel, or expertise to provide assistance to such emergency response authority.

Any emergency response authority designated in or pursuant to section 29-22-102 may request the department of public health and environment and the county or district public health agency to provide assistance. If there is no county or district public health agency for the area in which a hazardous substance incident occurs, such request may be made to the board of county commissioners in its capacity as the county board of health or to the mayor and council or trustees in their capacity as the municipal board of health. In addition, any other state or local agency with useful expertise shall have the authority, upon request, to provide assistance to and cooperate with the emergency response authority designated in or pursuant to section 29-22-102.

The department of public safety is hereby authorized to organize, through mutual aid or other agreements, a state emergency response team and regional emergency response teams. The state team may consist of any federal, state, local, or private entities that have the appropriately trained personnel and the necessary equipment to respond on a statewide basis to a hazardous substance incident. The regional teams may consist of any federal, state, local, or private entities that have the appropriately trained personnel and the necessary equipment to respond on a regional basis to a hazardous substance incident and to assist the state team in responding on a statewide basis to a hazardous substance incident. The state and regional teams shall be available to respond to hazardous substance incidents upon request made to the department of public safety by an emergency response authority. The emergency response authority that requests a response by the state emergency response team, a regional emergency response team, or both shall assure that the reasonable and documented costs of the team's or teams' response are included in any reimbursement for costs sought in accordance with this article. The emergency response authority shall distribute any such reimbursement that is made to it on a pro rata basis to each entity that made up the emergency response team or teams that responded to a hazardous substance incident.

Any municipal or county governing body, emergency response authority, private entity, the Colorado state patrol, or the department of public safety may enter into mutual aid or other agreements for the purpose of providing or conducting the emergency response to hazardous substance incidents. Such agreements may include procedures for utilizing equipment, personnel, and technical assistance.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1218, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(2)(a) amended, p. 2797, § 553, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1), (2)(b), and (3) amended, p. 434, § 2, effective April 30.

L. 2010:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2117, § 159, effective August 11.

L. 2016:

(3) amended, (HB 16-1046), ch. 60, p. 158, § 2, effective March 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 29-22-103 as it existed prior to 1983.

29-22-104. Right to claim reimbursement - rules.

A public entity, political subdivision of the state, unit of local government, or private entity is hereby given the right to claim reimbursement from the person or persons who have care, custody, and control of the hazardous substance involved at the time of the incident for the reasonable, necessary, and documented costs resulting from action taken to remove, contain, or otherwise mitigate the effects of the incident. A private entity that is neither a responsible party nor otherwise compensated may claim its costs only when it provided services under an agreement with the designated emergency response authority or fire department pursuant to section 29-22-102 or 29-22-103 that provides that the private entity will not be paid by the designated emergency response authority or fire department. A private entity may assist a fire department or designated emergency response authority in pursuing such a claim under subsection (3) of this section; however, the fire department or designated emergency response authority must approve the claim. When the action to remove, contain, or otherwise mitigate the effects of such an incident also involves extinguishing a fire, the costs may only include the extraordinary expenses related to the hazardous substance and not any expense related to extinguishing the fire. If the property on which the hazardous substance incident occurred lies within an unincorporated area of a county and not otherwise within a fire protection district, then the costs may include any expense related to the hazardous substance incident or to extinguishing the fire. If any such person is the owner of property upon which the hazardous substance incident occurs, collection of such costs may be made pursuant to section 30-10-513.5 (1), C.R.S.

Response costs recoverable under this section include the value of reasonable emergency response services provided by a private entity under an agreement for assistance with a fire department or the designated emergency response authority regardless of whether the private entity has been paid by the fire department or designated emergency response authority.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to change or impair any right of recovery or subrogation arising under any other provision of law.

The governing body of the emergency response authority designated in section 29-22-102 (3), or when the emergency response authority is the Colorado state patrol, the attorney general, shall be responsible for collecting any claims for reimbursement made pursuant to this section when more than one public entity, political subdivision of the state, or unit of local government has assisted in said removal, containment, or mitigation. Such responsibility shall include, when necessary, the filing of a civil action against the person responsible for the abandonment or spill. Any such agency which rendered assistance may also join any civil action as a party plaintiff or may assign any rights to the appropriate emergency response authority.

Any collections or recovery made by the emergency response authority shall be distributed on a pro rata basis among the agencies and private entities that rendered assistance.

The emergency response authority is entitled to recover its reasonable costs in collecting any reimbursement, including any attorney fees. If such costs are not included in a judgment rendered in a civil action, they shall be deducted from any recovery prior to the distribution provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3).

All moneys collected or recovered pursuant to the provisions of this section on behalf of the Colorado state patrol, except for moneys distributed to assisting agencies pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (3) or to pay legal fees or costs pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (3), shall be transmitted to the state treasurer who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund established in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

The provisions of this section shall apply to any claim for reimbursement for costs related to a hazardous substance which is authorized by other provisions of law.

Repealed.

The executive director of the department of public safety shall adopt rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., to create a process by which a public entity, political subdivision of the state, or unit of local government claiming reimbursement pursuant to this section shall establish that the costs attributed to a hazardous substance incident are reasonable, necessary, and documented. Such rules shall provide for consideration of all appropriate cost factors including but not limited to acquisition and operation expenses for equipment, salaries and benefits, the cost of expendable supplies, the cost differences between rural and urban areas, and the cost differences between responding entities that utilize paid staff and entities that use volunteers.

The executive director of the department of public safety shall create a list of qualified and knowledgeable persons who are willing to perform the role of voluntary ombudsman, mediator, or arbitrator to resolve disputes regarding claims for reimbursement made pursuant to this section and shall adopt rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., to establish the process by which the parties involved in such a dispute may access and arrange for the assistance of persons on the list. Persons on the list shall not receive compensation for their services from the state and shall not be state employees. Persons on the list shall not be subject to civil liability for any actions taken in good faith pursuant to this paragraph (b) or any rule adopted by the executive director of the department of public safety in accordance with this section.

Source:

L. 83:

R&RE, p. 1218, § 1, July 1.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 1280, § 2, effective April 26.

L. 99:

(3)(d) added, p. 493, § 1, effective April 30; (5) added, p. 435, § 3, effective April 30.

L. 2000:

(1) amended and (6) added, p. 991, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 2001:

(5)(c) repealed, p. 1179, § 15, effective August 8.

L. 2012:

(5) repealed, (HB 12-1283), ch. 240, p. 1136, § 53, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(1) and (3)(b) amended, (HB 16-1046), ch. 60, p. 158, § 3, effective March 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 29-22-104 as it existed prior to 1983.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act repealing subsection (5), see section 1 of chapter 240, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

29-22-105. Additional reimbursement for costs of assistance - subrogation of rights - recovery of reimbursements by attorney general.

Whenever any fire department or other public agency provides assistance to a designated emergency response authority, as provided in section 29-22-103 or 29-22-104, outside of the area of its jurisdiction, whenever assistance to a designated emergency response authority is provided pursuant to a mutual aid agreement, or whenever the department of public health and environment or the county, district, or municipal public health agency provides services such as laboratory analyses, waste removal, transportation, storage, or disposal, the reasonable documented costs of the equipment, supplies, analyses, and personnel provided by such fire department or public agency may be reimbursed, subject to guidelines by the executive director of the department of public safety. Reimbursement shall be for costs not recovered pursuant to section 29-22-104 and shall be out of any moneys made available by legislative appropriation therefor. In the event of such reimbursement, the state of Colorado shall be subrogated to any rights of such fire department or public agency with respect to the amounts so reimbursed. The attorney general shall pursue all available remedies to recover any moneys paid out pursuant to this section from the person responsible for said incident. Any moneys recovered by the attorney general shall be transmitted to the state treasurer. Nothing in this article shall be construed to enlarge or impair any right of recovery or subrogation arising under any other provision of law. The attorney general shall not attempt to recover any moneys from any person responding to a hazardous substance incident pursuant to a mutual aid agreement or to any provision of this article.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1219, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 721, § 3, effective April 11.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2117, § 160, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 29-22-105 as it existed prior to 1983.

29-22-106. Emergency response cash fund. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1220, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section repealed, p. 720, § 1, effective April 11.

29-22-106.5. Hazardous substances planning and response assistance fund - creation - acceptance of gifts, grants, and donations - grants to local government. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 1106, § 1, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (7) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2005. (See L. 99, p. 1106.)

29-22-107. Legislative finding - hazardous substance listing required.

The general assembly finds, determines, and declares:

That the protection of the public from the dangers of hazardous substance incidents occurring on private property, other than residential or agricultural property, is a matter of statewide concern;

That, without the provisions of this section, such protection is inadequate; and

That the provisions of this section are enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of protecting the peace, health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state.

Upon the request of the designated emergency response authority, the department of public health and environment, or the local fire department, any person who, in accordance with the following table, possesses the specified quantity, or a quantity in excess of that specified, of any hazard type of hazardous substance on private property shall provide the designated emergency response authority and the waste management division of the department of public health and environment and, when requested, the local fire department with a listing of the maximum quantity of each such hazard type reasonably anticipated to be present on the property at any time:

With respect to the terms listed as hazard types in the table in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2):

"Pyrophoric material" means any material which ignites spontaneously in dry or moist air at or below one hundred thirty degrees Fahrenheit.

The remaining terms shall have the meanings ascribed to them in 49 Code of Federal Regulations Subchapter C as in effect on July 1, 1983.

Any person requested to list pursuant to this subsection (2) shall update such list annually unless the designated response authority, the department of public health and environment, or the local fire department requests an updated list prior to the annual update.

Except as to those authorities designated in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), all information required to be provided under this subsection (2) shall be deemed privileged and shall not be released to any person or organization without the express written consent of the person providing the information.

The person who, without the express written consent required in subsection (2)(c)(II) of this section, releases information required to be provided by this subsection (2) commits a petty offense and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503.

The requirements of this subsection (2) do not apply to:

Motor fuel products in quantities less than forty-two thousand gallons in underground storage or less than six hundred twenty gallons in one tank or less than one thousand three hundred forty gallons in combination in above ground storage;

Hazardous substances in typical consumer-sized packaging or when being stored or used by a farmer or rancher at a facility used in active agricultural production;

Any person who has specific arrangements with a designated emergency response authority for responding to hazardous substance incidents;

Hazardous materials in transportation which are subject to the provisions of parts 1, 2, and 3 of article 20 of title 42, C.R.S.;

The armed forces of the United States or the state militia;

Explosives in forms prescribed by the official United States pharmacopoeia;

The sale, possession, or use of fireworks;

The possession, transportation, and use of small arms ammunition;

The possession, storage, and transportation of not more than fifty pounds of black powder and two thousand small arms primers for hand-loading of small arms ammunition for personal use unless otherwise regulated by the local jurisdiction;

The transportation and use of explosives or blasting agents by the United States bureau of mines, the federal bureau of investigation, the United States secret service, the United States department of the treasury, or a police or fire department acting in its official capacity;

Special industrial explosive devices which in the aggregate contain less than fifty pounds of explosives.

On or after October 1, 1983, any person failing to comply with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than one hundred dollars per day for each day during which said violation occurs. Such penalty shall be determined and collected by a court of competent jurisdiction upon an action instituted by the district attorney. Civil penalties collected shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the general fund.

Hazard type

Quantity

Class A or B explosive
Any quantity
Class C explosive
50 pounds
Etiological agent
Any quantity
Water reactive flammable solid
5 pounds
Pyrophoric material
5 pounds
Organic/inorganic peroxide
50 pounds
Poison A or poison B
100 pounds or 15 gallons
Flammable liquid other than a pyrophoric liquid
700 pounds or 120 gallons
Compressed flammable gas other than
3,000 cubic feet or more
liquefied petroleum gases
at one atmosphere at
seventy degrees Fahrenheit
Liquefied petroleum gases
Any installation exceeding
18,000 gallon water capacity
Oxidizer
200 pounds or 120 gallons
Combustible liquid
Class I
120 gallons
Class II
240 gallons
Class III
500 gallons
Corrosive material
200 pounds or 120 gallons
(unless a lesser amount is specified
in 49 Code of Federal Regulations
Part 172.101)
Irritating material
200 pounds or 120 gallons

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1220, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(2)(a) and (2)(c) amended, p. 811, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(2)(c)(II) amended, p. 1363, § 28, effective June 28.

L. 91:

(3) amended, p. 721, § 4, effective April 11.

L. 94:

(2)(a) and (2)(c)(I) amended, p. 2798, § 555, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2)(c)(III) amended, p. 1542, § 284, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(2)(d)(IV) amended, p. 2001, § 61, effective May 22.

L. 2016:

IP(2)(d) and (2)(d)(II) amended, (HB 16-1046), ch. 60, p. 159, § 4, effective March 31.

L. 2021:

(2)(c)(III) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3247, § 497, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 29-22-107 as it existed prior to 1983.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (2)(c)(III), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

29-22-108. Criminal penalties.

Any person who intentionally causes or substantially contributes to the occurrence of a hazardous substance incident in violation of the provision of this article commits a class 4 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Any person who willfully, recklessly, or with criminal negligence as defined in section 18-1-501, C.R.S., causes or substantially contributes to the occurrence of a hazardous substance incident in violation of the provisions of this article commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1222, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1542, § 285, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 29-22-108 as it existed prior to 1983.

Cross references:

(1) For the penalty for abandonment of a vehicle containing hazardous waste or the intentional spilling of hazardous waste on streets or highways, see § 18-13-112; for the penalty for hazardous waste violations, see § 25-15-310; for the penalty for abandonment of a vehicle containing hazardous materials or the intentional spilling of hazardous materials on streets or highways, see § 42-20-113; for penalties for violations of the "Hazardous Materials Transportation Act of 1987", see §§ 42-20-106, 42-20-109, 42-20-111, 42-20-113, 42-20-204, and 42-20-305.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

29-22-109. Persons rendering assistance relating to hazardous substance incidents - legislative declaration - exemption from civil liability.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that knowledgeable individuals and organizations should be encouraged to lend expert assistance in the event of a hazardous substance incident. The purpose of this section is to so encourage such individuals and organizations to lend assistance by providing them with limited immunity from civil liability.

As used in this section, "person" means individual, government or governmental subdivision or agency, corporation, partnership, or association or any other legal entity.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any person who provides assistance or advice in mitigating or attempting to mitigate the effects of an actual or threatened hazardous substance incident, or in preventing, cleaning up, or disposing of or in attempting to prevent, clean up, or dispose of any such incident, shall not be subject to civil liability for such assistance or advice, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any person who provides assistance upon request of any emergency response authority, police agency, fire department, rescue or emergency squad, or any governmental agency in the event of an accident or other emergency involving the use, handling, transportation, transmission, or storage of hazardous substance, when the reasonably apparent circumstances require prompt decisions and actions, shall not be liable for any civil damages resulting from any act of commission or omission on his part in the course of his rendering such assistance, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

The exemption from civil liability provided for in this section shall not apply to:

Any person whose act or omission caused in whole or in part such discharge and who would otherwise be liable therefor;

Any person, other than the employee of a governmental subdivision or agency, who receives compensation other than reimbursement for out-of-pocket expenses for his assistance or advice;

Any person's gross negligence or reckless, wanton, or intentional misconduct.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to abrogate or limit the sovereign immunity granted to public entities pursuant to article 10 of title 24, C.R.S., the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act".

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1222, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 29-22-109 as it existed prior to 1983.

29-22-110. Colorado state patrol to provide information.

The Colorado state patrol shall compile and maintain information on the emergency response capabilities of public and private agencies throughout the state to enable the state patrol to answer any inquiry concerning the nearest agencies or entities available to contribute equipment and personnel to aid in the emergency response to any hazardous substance incident. The state patrol shall also compile and maintain information regarding which local, state, or federal agencies or entities should be notified of any hazardous substance incident. The state patrol shall establish, maintain, and publicize a telephone service to make such information available to the public twenty-four hours each day and shall notify each emergency response authority designated in or pursuant to section 29-22-102 as responsible for the emergency response to a hazardous substance incident of such service. With respect to the powers and duties specified in this section, the state patrol shall have no rule-making authority and shall avail itself of all available private resources. The state patrol shall coordinate its activities pursuant to this section with the department of public health and environment and the department of local affairs.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 437, § 6, effective April 30.